Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 6 Pay and Allowances

30-6-1.
Method of payment for emergency active duty.

Payment of the commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons ordered into service under §

30-2-6

and payment of all expenses for transportation, rations, forage, gasoline, oil, shelter, medical care, arms, ammunition, equipment, and supplies incurred and that were rendered necessary in connection with the service ordered under §

30-2-6

, shall be paid by the state from appropriations or sources that are separate and distinct from any regular annual appropriation for the support and maintenance of the military establishment in the following manner:

The adjutant general, upon receiving the muster and payrolls, shall at once examine and compare these with the muster rolls in his or her office and if found correct and upon approval by the governor, shall certify these to the controller; and the controller shall draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer in favor of the adjutant general for such sums as may be required and the general treasurer shall pay these sums to the adjutant general. The adjutant general shall, within ten (10) days after receiving this money, pay to the commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons the amount due to each person.

All expenses, enumerated above, shall be paid when supported by proper vouchers, approved by the governor, and the controller shall draw his or her orders on the general treasurer in favor of the adjutant general for such sums as may be required and the general treasurer shall pay these sums to the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 160; G.L. 1956, §

30-6-1

.

30-6-2.
Pay of officers on active duty.

Every commissioned officer or warrant officer of the national guard, ordered to duty by the governor or under his or her authority, or detailed by the governor or under his or her authority to serve on or with any military board, court of inquiry, or court martial, shall receive for every day actually on duty the same pay and allowances that a federally recognized national guard commissioned officer or warrant officer, of the same grade and length of service, would receive or be entitled to when participating, in a federal pay status, in encampments or maneuvers prescribed or authorized under the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder; provided, however, that no officer or warrant officer shall receive less than the minimum federal hourly wage rate then prevailing on the day of duty for hours served on duty, up to a maximum of twelve (12) hours of duty, regardless of the extra hours served.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 161; G.L. 1956, §

30-6-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 31.

30-6-3.
Pay of enlisted persons on active duty.

Each enlisted person of the Rhode Island army or air national guard ordered to duty by the governor, or under his or her authority, shall receive or be entitled to, for every day actually on duty, the same pay and allowances that an enlisted person of the same grade and length of service in a federally recognized unit of the Rhode Island army or air national guard would receive or be entitled to, when participating in a federal pay status, in encampments or maneuvers prescribed or authorized under the laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder; provided, however, that no enlisted person shall receive less than the minimum federal hourly wage rate then prevailing on the day of duty for the hours served on duty up to a maximum of twelve (12) hours of duty, regardless of the extra hours served.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 162; G.L. 1956, §

30-6-3

; P.L. 1967, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 132, § 1.

30-6-3.1.
Employment as civilian.

When an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the Rhode Island army or air national guard shall be employed as a civilian for any work or service connected or associated with the Rhode Island army or air national guard, he or she shall receive at least the minimum hourly wage or salary as prescribed by the state pay plan for this work or service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-6-3.1

; P.L. 1967, ch. 72, § 2.

30-6-4.
Personal performance of duty required.

No commissioned officer or warrant officer or enlisted person in the national guard shall receive the compensation provided for in chapters 1 — 14 of this title unless he or she personally performs the duties prescribed by law, and no substitute shall be allowed compensation for service belonging to another to perform, nor shall excuses granted for absence from, or nonperformance of, militia duty entitle the person excused to receive this compensation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 163; G.L. 1956, §

30-6-4

.

30-6-5.
Pay differential for state employees on active duty.

Employees of a state agency, who are eligible as defined within, may qualify for a military pay differential, hereafter also referred to as a “differential”. Such differential shall consist of the difference between the base pay for state employment that the state employee would have received if not on active military duty and the military pay that the employee on active military duty did receive, for the same time period. The differential does not include the payment of overtime in state employment.

In order to be eligible for a military pay differential, a recipient must be a member of the National Guard or a Reserve component of the United States Armed Forces who is currently mobilized in support of a Presidential reserve call-up for active military duty, who at the time of being called for active military duty was an employee of a state department who otherwise qualifies for a military pay differential, as described above.

The state department where the state employee worked when called to active duty shall periodically pay every employee who qualifies for a military pay differential. The first such payment shall be paid to eligible state employees for military pay differentials between July 1 and September 30. Such stipends shall be calculated for each three-month (3) period thereafter, but shall terminate upon the employee’s return from active duty or after the employee has received the differential for one year, whichever comes first.

The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for developing necessary rules and regulations in order to implement the provisions of this section. These rules shall include a process for determining eligibility and the amount of the differential.

To the extent that compensation for being called to active military duty is not already included in existing collective bargaining agreements, eligible employees of a state agency will qualify for the military pay differential, as defined above. When a collective bargaining agreement provides equal or greater benefits, the terms of the collective bargaining agreement shall control for as long as those benefits under the contract are applicable. Thereafter, those union employees shall be granted the difference in pay as described above.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 28, § 1.

30-6-6.
Rights of employees entering service to maintain health care benefits.

Every employee holding a position in municipal service, who has left or shall leave the position by reason of entering the armed forces of the United States (whether through membership in the reserve of the United States Military or Naval Forces or in the Rhode Island national guard or naval reserves, when any of the foregoing units are called to active federal or state duty, or by reason of enlistment, induction commission, or otherwise), and who, at the time of entrance into the armed services, had family medical benefits, shall continue to be eligible to receive family medical benefits, in the same manner as available prior to entering service, for designated family members, excluding the employee, during the duration of his or her absences required by the continuance of service in the armed services and his or her return to municipal service. Nothing in this section, however, shall require the employee to continue family medical benefits provided by the municipality or prevent the employee from enrolling in or receiving medical benefits from another source of health insurance coverage including the federal medical benefits program for deployed members of the armed services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 174, § 1.